test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-taeuesj20_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - täüś: # Noun (20) täüś 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm

    täüś+N+Sg+Nom: täüś
    täüś+N+Sg+Gen: tävve
    täüś+N+Sg+Par: täüt
    täüś+N+Sg+Ill: täüde
    täüś+N+Sg+Ine: [tävven, tävveh, tävvehn]
    täüś+N+Sg+Ela: tävvest
    täüś+N+Sg+All: tävvele
    täüś+N+Sg+Ade: tävvel
    täüś+N+Sg+Abl: tävvelt
    täüś+N+Sg+Tra: tävves
    täüś+N+Sg+Ter: tävveniq
    täüś+N+Sg+Abe: tävveldäq
    täüś+N+Sg+Com: tävvegaq
    täüś+N+Pl+Nom: tävveq
    täüś+N+Pl+Gen: [täüsi, täüte]
    täüś+N+Pl+Par: täüsi
    täüś+N+Pl+Ill: [täüsihe, täüside]
    täüś+N+Pl+Ine: [täüsin, täüsih, täüsihn, täüten, täüteh, täütehn]
    täüś+N+Pl+Ela: [täüsist, täütest]
    täüś+N+Pl+All: [täüsile, täütele]
    täüś+N+Pl+Ade: [täüsil, täütel]
    täüś+N+Pl+Abl: [täüsilt, täütelt]
    täüś+N+Pl+Tra: [täüsis, täütes]
    täüś+N+Pl+Ter: [täüsiniq, täüteniq]
    täüś+N+Pl+Abe: [täüsildäq, täüteldäq]
    täüś+N+Pl+Com: [täüsigaq, täütegaq]
